District of Columbia statutes.
34-1259.01

Right to inspection.

The cable system and all parts of the system, during both operation and construction, shall be subject to the right of inspection by the Office or its designee.

History

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 901
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334